Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part V Fraudulent and Other Prohibited Practices

7-11-501.
Offers, sales, and purchases.

In connection with the offer to sell, sale, offer to purchase, or purchase of a security, a person may not, directly or indirectly:

Employ a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud;

Make an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statement made, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading; or

Engage in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit on a person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-502.
Market manipulation.

Without limiting the general applicability of §

7-11-501

, a person may not directly or indirectly:

Quote a fictitious price with respect to a security;

Effect a transaction in a security which involved no change in the beneficial ownership of the security for the purpose of creating a false or misleading appearance of active trading in a security or with respect to the market for the security;

Enter an order for the purpose of a security with the knowledge that an order of substantially the same size and at substantially the same time and price for the sale of the security has been, or will be, entered by or for the same, or affiliated, person for the purpose of creating a false or misleading appearance of active trading in a security or with respect to the market for the security;

Enter an order for the sale of a security with knowledge that an order of substantially the same size and at substantially the same time and price for the purchase of the security has been, or will be, entered by or for the same, or affiliated, person for the purpose of creating a false or misleading appearance of active trading in a security or with respect to the market for the security; or

Employ any other deceptive or fraudulent device, scheme, or artifice to manipulate the market in a security.

Transactions effected in compliance with the applicable provisions of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq., and the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission under that Act do not constitute market manipulation under subsection (a).

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-503.
Prohibited transactions by investment advisers, federal covered advisers.

An investment adviser, a federal covered adviser, or a person who represents an investment adviser or a federal covered adviser may not, directly or indirectly:

Employ a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud a client;

Engage in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon a client; or

Act as principal for his or her own account, knowingly sell any security to or purchase any security from a client, or acting as broker for a person other than the client, knowingly effect any sale or purchase of any security for the account of the client, without disclosing to the client, in writing, before the completion of the transaction the capacity in which he or she is acting and obtaining the consent of the client to the transaction. The prohibitions of this subsection do not apply to a federal covered adviser or to any transaction with a customer of a broker-dealer if the broker-dealer is not acting as an investment adviser in relation to the transaction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1.

7-11-504.
Misleading filings.

In a document filed with the director or in a proceeding under this chapter, no person may make or cause to be made any untrue statement of material fact or omit or cause to be omitted a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-505.
Unlawful representations concerning licensing, registration, or exemption.

Neither the fact that a notice filing or an application for licensing or a registration statement has been filed under this chapter nor the fact that a person is licensed or a security is registered under this chapter constitutes a finding by the director that a document filed under this chapter is true, complete, and not misleading. Neither of those facts nor the fact that an exemption or exception is available for a security or a transaction means that the director has passed upon the merits or qualifications of, or recommended or given approval to, a person, security, or transaction.

No person may make, or cause to be made, to a purchaser, customer, or client a representation inconsistent with subsection (a) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1.